apertium-en-ca/partofspeech/apertium_vb.en.dix
<pardef n="forb/id__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>id</l>
          <r>id<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>id</l>
          <r>id<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ids</l>
          <r>id<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ade</l>
          <r>id<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ad</l>
          <r>id<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>idden</l>
          <r>id<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iding</l>
          <r>id<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iding</l>
          <r>id<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iding</l>
          <r>id<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>  
    
<pardef n="/go__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>go</l>
          <r>go<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>go</l>
          <r>go<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>goes</l>
          <r>go<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>went</l>
          <r>go<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gone</l>
          <r>go<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>going</l>
          <r>go<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>going</l>
          <r>go<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>going</l>
          <r>go<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>  
    
<pardef n="s/ee__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ee</l>
          <r>ee<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ee</l>
          <r>ee<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ees</l>
          <r>ee<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aw</l>
          <r>ee<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>een</l>
          <r>ee<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eeing</l>
          <r>ee<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eeing</l>
          <r>ee<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eeing</l>
          <r>ee<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>  
    
<pardef n="s/ell__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ell</l>
          <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ell</l>
          <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ells</l>
          <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>old</l>
          <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>old</l>
          <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elling</l>
          <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elling</l>
          <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elling</l>
          <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>   
    
<pardef n="forg/et__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ets</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ot</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>otten</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>etting</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>etting</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>etting</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>  
    
<pardef n="g/ive__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ive</l>
          <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ive</l>
          <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ives</l>
          <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ave</l>
          <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iven</l>
          <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iving</l>
          <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iving</l>
          <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iving</l>
          <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>   
    
<pardef n="sw/ear__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ear</l>
          <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ear</l>
          <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ears</l>
          <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ore</l>
          <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orn</l>
          <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>earing</l>
          <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>earing</l>
          <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>earing</l>
          <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>   
    

<e lm="foresee"><i>fores</i><par n="s/ee__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="forget"><i>forg</i><par n="forg/et__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="give"><i>g</i><par n="g/ive__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="go"><par n="/go__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="see"><i>s</i><par n="s/ee__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sell"><i>s</i><par n="s/ell__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tell"><i>t</i><par n="s/ell__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="wear"><i>w</i><par n="sw/ear__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="give back"><i>g</i><par n="g/ive__vblex"/><p><l><b/>back</l><r><g><b/>back</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="go back"><i></i><par n="/go__vblex"/><p><l><b/>back</l><r><g><b/>back</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="go down"><i></i><par n="/go__vblex"/><p><l><b/>down</l><r><g><b/>down</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="go in"><i></i><par n="/go__vblex"/><p><l><b/>in</l><r><g><b/>in</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="go on"><i></i><par n="/go__vblex"/><p><l><b/>on</l><r><g><b/>on</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="go out"><i></i><par n="/go__vblex"/><p><l><b/>out</l><r><g><b/>out</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="go up"><i></i><par n="/go__vblex"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="swear"><i>sw</i> <par n="sw/ear__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="forbid"><i>forb</i> <par n="forb/id__vblex"/></e>
